Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [609.5945] DAMAGE TO FARM MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "agricultural land" has the meaning given in section 273.13, subdivision 23. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Crime. new text end new text begin Whoever, without consent of the owner or operator of the agricultural land, places in a growing crop any device of iron, steel, ceramic, or other substance sufficiently hard to damage harvesting, spraying, or similar machinery or tillage, irrigation, fertilizing, or planting equipment used to produce the crop, with intent to damage the machinery or equipment, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Restitution. new text end new text begin In addition to any sentence imposed under subdivision 2, the sentencing court must order a person convicted of violating this section to pay restitution to the owner of the damaged machinery or equipment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.605, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Misdemeanor. (a) deleted text begin The following terms have the meanings given them for purposes of this sectiondeleted text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings givennew text end . (1) "Premises" means real property and any appurtenant building or structure. (2) "Dwelling" means the building or part of a building used by an individual as a place of residence on either a full-time or a part-time basis. A dwelling may be part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building, or a manufactured home as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 16. (3) "Construction site" means the site of the construction, alteration, painting, or repair of a building or structure. (4) "Owner or lawful possessor," as used in paragraph (b), clause (9), means the person on whose behalf a building or dwelling is being constructed, altered, painted, or repaired and the general contractor or subcontractor engaged in that work. (5) "Posted," as used: (i) in paragraph (b), clause (4), means the placement of a sign at least 8-1/2 inches by 11 inches in a conspicuous place on the exterior of the building, or in a conspicuous place within the property on which the building is located. The sign must carry a general notice warning against trespass; (ii) in paragraph (b), clause (9), means the placement of a sign at least 8-1/2 inches by 11 inches in a conspicuous place on the exterior of the building that is under construction, alteration, or repair, or in a conspicuous place within the area being protected. If the area being protected is less than three acres, one additional sign must be conspicuously placed within that area. If the area being protected is three acres but less than ten acres, two additional signs must be conspicuously placed within that area. For each additional full ten acres of area being protected beyond the first ten acres of area, two additional signs must be conspicuously placed within the area being protected. The sign must carry a general notice warning against trespass; and (iii) in paragraph (b), clause (10), means the placement of signs that: (A) carry a general notice warning against trespass; (B) display letters at least two inches high; (C) state that Minnesota law prohibits trespassing on the property; and (D) are posted in a conspicuous place and at intervals of 500 feet or less. (6) "Business licensee," as used in paragraph (b), clause (9), includes a representative of a building trades labor or management organization. (7) "Building" has the meaning given in section 609.581, subdivision 2. (b) A person is guilty of a misdemeanor if the person intentionally: (1) permits domestic animals or fowls under the actor's control to go on the land of another within a city; (2) interferes unlawfully with a monument, sign, or pointer erected or marked to designate a point of a boundary, line or a political subdivision, or of a tract of land; (3) trespasses on the premises of another and, without claim of right, refuses to depart from the premises on demand of the lawful possessor; (4) occupies or enters the dwelling or locked or posted building of another, without claim of right or consent of the owner or the consent of one who has the right to give consent, except in an emergency situation; (5) new text begin except as provided in section 609.605, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), new text end enters the premises of another with intent to take or injure any fruit, fruit trees, or vegetables growing on the premises, without the permission of the owner or occupant; (6) enters or is found on the premises of a public or private cemetery without authorization during hours the cemetery is posted as closed to the public; (7) returns to the property of another with the intent to abuse, disturb, or cause distress in or threaten another, after being told to leave the property and not to return, if the actor is without claim of right to the property or consent of one with authority to consent; (8) returns to the property of another within one year after being told to leave the property and not to return, if the actor is without claim of right to the property or consent of one with authority to consent; (9) enters the locked or posted construction site of another without the consent of the owner or lawful possessor, unless the person is a business licensee; (10) enters the locked or posted aggregate mining site of another without the consent of the owner or lawful possessor, unless the person is a business licensee; or (11) crosses into or enters any public or private area lawfully cordoned off by or at the direction of a peace officer engaged in the performance of official duties. As used in this clause: (i) an area may be "cordoned off" through the use of tape, barriers, or other means conspicuously placed and identifying the area as being restricted by a peace officer and identifying the responsible authority; and (ii) "peace officer" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1. It is an affirmative defense to a charge under this clause that a peace officer permitted entry into the restricted area. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.605, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Gross misdemeanor. new text begin (a) new text end Whoever trespasses upon the grounds of a facility providing emergency shelter services for battered women, as defined under section 611A.31, subdivision 3, or providing comparable services for sex trafficking victims, as defined under section 609.321, subdivision 7b, or of a facility providing transitional housing for battered women and their children or sex trafficking victims and their children, without claim of right or consent of one who has right to give consent, and refuses to depart from the grounds of the facility on demand of one who has right to give consent, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text begin (b) Whoever trespasses upon agricultural land, as defined under section 273.13, subdivision 23, with intent to take or injure an agricultural crop or to damage farm machinery or equipment used to produce the agricultural crop is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end